Hawaii statutes.
[§286-211] Permits to operate official
inspection stations. (a) The director shall issue permits for and furnish
instructions and all forms to official inspection stations. The stations shall
operate pursuant to standards established by the director.

(b) Application for an official inspection
station permit shall be made upon an official form and shall be granted only
when the director is satisfied that the station is properly equipped and has
competent personnel to make the required inspections. Before issuing a permit,
the director shall require the applicant to file proof that the applicant has,
in effect, a liability insurance policy, issued to the applicant by an
insurance company, authorized to do business in the State, insuring against the
liability of the applicant and any of the applicant's employees, in minimum
amounts as follows: comprehensive public liability insurance in the amount of
$10,000 for one person and $20,000 for one accident and comprehensive property
damage insurance of $5,000, provided that the director may, by rules and
regulations, set higher limits; provided that the proof of insurance need not
be filed by an applicant who inspects only vehicles owned by the applicant; and
provided further that the proof of insurance need not be filed by
instrumentalities of the United States.

(c) A permit for an official inspection
station shall not be assigned or transferred or used at any location other than
that designated by the director and every permit shall be posted in a conspicuous
place at the location so designated. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next